California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(o) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer
 or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(p) For purposes of this section, “person” means the feepayer, a member of the feepayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the feepayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the feepayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the feepayer, directly or indirectly.

(q) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 88.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 89 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

46628.

(a) The director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final fee liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final fee liability” means any final fee liability arising under Part 24 (commencing with Section 46001), or related interest, additions to fees, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the feepayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued
 business.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the feepayer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The feepayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the feepayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The feepayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the feepayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(f) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final fee liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid fee and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the feepayer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud
 or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the feepayer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the feepayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the feepayer.

(i) When more than one feepayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, feepayers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable feepayer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other feepayers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of fees
 or penalties or total fees and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the feepayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid fees and related penalties, additions to fees, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or
 organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the feepayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 40175. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(k) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department property belonging to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record, or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(2) The feepayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(l) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to
 the estate of a feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the feepayer, a member of the feepayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the feepayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the feepayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the feepayer, directly or indirectly.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 89.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Disposition of Proceeds [46651. - 46653.]

46651.

All fees, interest, and penalties imposed and all amounts of fee required to be paid to the state pursuant to Sections 46051 and 46052 shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund or the Oil Spill Response Trust Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46652.

The money in the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund and the Oil Spill Response Trust Fund shall, upon order of the Controller, be drawn therefrom for refunds under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46653.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the administrator shall direct the board to provide refunds of the excess money whenever the administrator makes both of the following determinations:

(1) The administrator determines, pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code, that the total amount in the Oil Spill Response Trust Fund, collected pursuant to Section 46052, exceeds the total of the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 46012.

 (2) The administrator determines additional collection is not necessary to provide for the purposes specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, and paragraph (8), of subdivision (k) of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code or to repay any draw upon the financial security obtained by the Treasurer pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 8670.48 of the Government Code or money borrowed pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 8670.53.1) of Chapter 7.4 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including principal, interest, premium, fees, charges, or costs of any kind incurred in connection with those borrowings or that financial security.

(b) The board, as directed by the administrator pursuant to subdivision (a), shall refund the excess money in that fund to each person who paid the fee to the state in proportion to the amount that person paid into the fund during
 the preceding 12 monthly reporting periods in which there was a fee due, including the month in which the fund exceeded the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 46012.

(c) If the amount of money in the fund exceeds the amount specified in this section by 10 percent or less, the administrator is not required to order refunds pursuant to this section.

(d) Nothing in this section shall require the refund of excess fees more frequently than once each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 373, Sec. 20.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Violations [46701. - 46706.]

46701.

Any person who refuses to furnish any return required to be made, or who refuses to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense in the discretion of the court, together with costs of investigation and prosecution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46702.

Any person who knowingly or willfully files a false return with the board, and any person who refuses to permit the board or any of its representatives to make any inspection or examination for which provision is made in this part, or who fails to keep records as prescribed by the board, or who fails to preserve those records for the inspection of the board for such time as the board determines to be necessary, or who alters, cancels, or obliterates entries in the records for the purpose of falsifying the records is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than
 one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one month nor more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court, together with costs of investigation and prosecution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46703.

Any person who willfully evades or attempts in any manner to evade or defeat the payment of the fee imposed by this part is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46704.

Every person convicted for a violation of this part for which another penalty or punishment is not specifically provided for in this part is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court, together with costs of investigation and prosecution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

46705.

Every person convicted of a felony for a violation of this part for which another punishment is not specifically provided for in this part shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court, together with the cost of
 investigation and prosecution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 589.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

46706.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Disclosure of Information [46751. - 46751.]

46751.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall provide any and all information obtained under this part to the administrator.

(b) The
 administrator and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may use any information obtained pursuant to this part to develop data on oil spill prevention, abatement, and cleanup within the state. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
 administrator may make oil and renewable fuel spill prevention, abatement, and cleanup public.

(c) It shall be unlawful for the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration or any person having an administrative duty under Chapter 7.4 (commencing with Section 8670.1) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code or Division 7.8 (commencing with Section 8750) of the Public Resources Code to make known, in any manner whatever, the business affairs, operations, or any other information pertaining to a fee payer that was submitted to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration in a report or return required by this part, or to permit any report or copy thereof or any book containing any abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person not expressly authorized by subdivision (a),
 subdivision (d), and this subdivision. However, the Governor may, by general or special order, authorize examination of the records maintained by the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under this part by other state officers, by officers of another state, by the federal government, if a reciprocal arrangement exists, or by any other person. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order may authorize that it be made public.

(d) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may furnish to any state or federal agency investigating violations of or enforcing any state or federal law related to crude oil, petroleum products, and renewable fuel any crude oil, petroleum products, and renewable fuel information in the possession of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration that is deemed necessary for the enforcement of those laws.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information regarding the determination of any unpaid fee or the amount of fees, interest, or penalties required to be collected or assessed.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or increasing the public’s access to information on any aspect of oil spill prevention, abatement, and cleanup collected pursuant to other state or local laws, regulations, or ordinances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 96.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 25. Lithium Extraction Tax Law [47000. - 47115.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [47000. - 47002.]

47000.

(a) This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Lithium Extraction Tax Law.

(b) The purpose of this part is to promote a robust California-based lithium extraction industry that considers the needs of the local communities where the lithium extraction occurs, while recognizing the significant benefit of having a domestic supply of lithium for the state’s goals for reducing the emissions of greenhouse gases. By imposing a statewide tax on lithium extraction and preempting the taxing authority of counties, municipalities, and districts on the extraction and storage of lithium, lithium producers will have greater certainty about the potential costs of doing business and will be more likely to engage in lithium production
 activities.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to comprehensively regulate the imposition and collection of taxes on the extraction and storage of lithium and to occupy the field to the exclusion of local action, except as specifically provided in this part.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that promoting the development of a robust lithium production industry in the state to reduce the impact of climate change is a matter of statewide concern and, therefore, is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47002.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(b) “Extraction” means the process of removing lithium from geothermal fluid, spodumene ore, rock, minerals, clay, or any other naturally occurring substance by a physical or chemical process.

(c) “Geothermal fluid” means naturally occurring groundwater, brines, vapor, and steam associated with, or derived from, a geothermal resource.

(d) “Geothermal resource” has the same meaning
 as defined in Section 6903 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) “In this state” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within these limits owned by, or ceded to, the United States.

(f) “Metric ton” means a unit of mass equal to 1,000 kilograms.

(g) “Minerals” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2005 of the Public Resources Code.

(h) “Producer” means any person who extracts lithium from geothermal fluid, spodumene ore, rock, minerals, clay, or any other naturally occurring substance in this state.

(i) “Committee” means the Lithium Extraction Tax Citizens Oversight
 Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.   (SB 797)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Lithium Extraction Excise Tax [47010. - 47020.]

47010.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2023, a producer shall pay a lithium extraction excise tax upon each metric ton of lithium carbonate equivalent extracted from geothermal fluid, spodumene ore, rock, minerals, clay, or any other naturally occurring substance in this state, at the following amounts:Lifetime cumulative metric tons of lithium carbonate equivalent extracted by a producer:Applicable tax rate:20,000 or less$400 per metric ton extracted.Over 20,000 but not over 30,000.$600 per metric ton extracted over 20,000 up to 30,000 metric tons, inclusive.Over 30,000 metric tons.$800 per metric ton extracted over 30,000.

(b) (1) The tax brackets specified in subdivision (a) shall apply to the total metric tons of lithium carbonate extracted by a producer cumulatively beginning from the date the first metric ton of lithium carbonate was extracted. In each quarterly reporting period, as described in Section 47070, the producer shall add the amount of metric tons of lithium carbonate extracted during that quarter to the cumulative amount of lithium carbonate previously reported by the producer.

(2) Where the permit (ownership) of a mine, lithium extraction facility, or well changes, the cumulative amount of lithium carbonate extracted previously reported by the producer shall be assumed to be 30,000 metric tons.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2025, the lithium extraction tax rate imposed under subdivision (a) shall be adjusted annually by the department consistent with increases and decreases in the cost of living, as measured by the California Consumer Price Index issued by the Department of Industrial Relations or a successor agency, rounded to the nearest whole dollar. The first adjustment pursuant to this subdivision shall be an amount equal to the increase or decrease in the California Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) from June 2023 to June 2024. Subsequent annual adjustments shall cover subsequent 12-month periods. The adjusted rate shall apply beginning the following January 1.

(d) A producer shall remit the tax to the department in a manner and form as prescribed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47015.

For purposes of this part, the lithium and lithium compounds extracted shall be converted to lithium carbonate equivalent by multiplying the tonnage of lithium and lithium compounds by the appropriate conversion factor, as follows:Lithium or lithium compound:Conversion factor:Lithium (Li)5.323Lithium oxide (Li2O)2.473Lithium chloride (LiCl)0.871Lithium bromide (LiBr)0.425Lithium hydroxide monohydrate (LiOH.H2O)0.880Butyllithium (C4HgLi)0.576Lithium carbonate (Li2CO3)1.000

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47020.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this part preempt provisions pertaining to the imposition of taxes by counties, municipalities, and districts to the extent that the provisions are inconsistent with this part.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the taxes imposed by this part are in lieu of all county, municipal, or district taxes on lithium extraction or lithium storage by producers.

(c) This section does not prohibit the application of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) to the sale, storage, use, or other consumption of lithium.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Administration [47060. - 47100.]

47060.

The department shall administer and collect the taxes imposed by this part pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001)). For purposes of this part, the references in the Fee Collection Procedures Law to “fee” shall include the taxes imposed by this part, and references to “feepayer” shall include a person required to pay the taxes imposed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47070.

(a) The taxes imposed by this part shall be due and payable quarterly on or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter.

(b) The payments shall be accompanied by a return filed by the producer using electronic media on or before the last day of the month following each quarterly period for the preceding quarterly period. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47080.

(a) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part, including, but not limited to, provisions governing collections, reporting, refunds, and appeals.

(b) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce emergency regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. Any emergency regulations prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the
 Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47090.

(a) A producer subject to this part shall register for a permit with the department using electronic media and shall set forth the name under which it transacts or intends to transact business and any other information as the department may require.

(b) By September 1 of each year, the Department of Conservation shall provide to the department the annual reports submitted pursuant to Section 2207 of the Public Resources Code that report on the extraction of lithium from geothermal fluid, spodumene ore, rock, minerals, clay, or any other naturally occurring substance by a physical or chemical process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47100.

All revenues collected pursuant to this part, less refunds and reimbursement to the department for expenses incurred in the administration and collection of the taxes imposed by this part, shall be deposited into the Lithium Extraction Excise Tax Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, as follows:

(a) (1) Eighty percent shall be disbursed by the Controller to all counties in proportion to the amounts of the taxes, interest, penalties, and other amounts collected for lithium extraction within each county. Each county shall establish for deposit of
 these revenues an account or fund separate from the other accounts and
 funds of the county.

(2) (A) Of the amount disbursed to the County of Imperial pursuant to this subdivision, the county shall establish a method to distribute an amount not less than 30 percent of that disbursed amount to the County of Imperial communities that are most directly and indirectly impacted by the lithium extraction activities, including, but not limited to, the following communities:

(i) The directly affected communities listed below:

(I) Bombay Beach.

(II) The City of Brawley.

(III) The City of Calipatria.

(IV) Niland.

(V) The City of Westmorland.

(ii) The indirectly affected communities listed below:

(I) Bard.

(II) The City of Calexico.

(III) Desert Shores.

(IV) The City of El Centro.

(V) Heber.

(VI) The City of Holtville.

(VII) The City of Imperial.

(VIII) Ocotillo.

(IX) Palo Verde.

(X) Salton City.

(XI) Salton Sea Beach.

(XII) Seeley.

(XIII) Winterhaven.

(XIV) Vista Del Mar.

(B) The County of Imperial shall annually, on a date and in a manner determined by the department, report to the department the communities to which funding was distributed pursuant to this paragraph.

(b) Twenty percent shall be
 disbursed as follows:

(1) Twenty percent of the revenues collected in the County of Imperial shall be deposited into the Salton Sea Lithium Fund created in Section 2951 of the Fish and Game Code.

(2) Twenty percent of the revenues collected in a county other than the County of Imperial shall be disbursed to that county for distribution to communities in that county that are the most impacted by the lithium extraction activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.   (SB 974)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Citizens Oversight Committee [47110. - 47115.]

47110.

(a) The Lithium Extraction Tax Citizens Oversight Committee is hereby established within the department for the purposes of ensuring that revenues from the lithium extraction excise tax are distributed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (b) of Section 47100 and revenues deposited pursuant to subdivision (b) are allocated pursuant to Section 2951 of the Fish and Game Code, and making recommendations on how to
 improve community engagement and maximize community benefits from the revenues.

(b) The committee shall be composed of the following members: 

(1) Three public members who reside in the local communities where the lithium extraction occurs, to be appointed by the Governor.

(2) Two public members who reside in the local communities where the lithium extraction occurs, to be appointed by the Senate Rules Committee. Of these two public members, one shall have environmental justice expertise and the other shall have economic development expertise.

(3) Two public members who reside in the local communities where the lithium extraction occurs, to be
 appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. Of these two public members, one shall have environmental restoration expertise and the other shall have vocational training expertise.

(c) The members of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power and shall be appointed for terms of two years.

(d) The members of the committee shall serve without compensation.

(e) (1) Meetings of the committee shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) The committee shall meet not more than once per calendar quarter.

(3) The committee shall hold its first meeting on the calendar quarter following the calendar quarter when the first revenues of the lithium extraction excise tax have been collected.

(f) The committee shall be responsible for the collection and analysis of any information included in the report required pursuant to Section 47115.

(g) The department’s duties pursuant to this section shall be limited to the following:

(1) Administrative support for meetings held pursuant to subdivision (e).

(2) Compilation of the report required to be submitted by the committee
 pursuant to Section 47115.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 506, Sec. 3.   (SB 797)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

47115.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the committee shall report to the Legislature on how the revenues from the collection of the lithium extraction excise tax were distributed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 47100 and how revenues deposited pursuant to subdivision (b) were allocated
 pursuant to Section 2951 of the Fish and Game Code in the prior fiscal year and any recommendations for improving the
 distribution or allocation, or both, of those revenues to enhance the health and welfare of the local communities where the lithium extraction occurs.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the report required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted on April 1, 2027 and every April 1 thereafter.

(2) The report shall be submitted in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 506, Sec. 3.   (SB 797)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 26. UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK MAINTENANCE FEE LAW [50101. - 50162.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [50101. - 50107.]

50101.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Underground Storage Tank Maintenance Fee Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50102.

The collection and administration of the fee specified in Section 50108 shall be governed by the definitions contained in Chapter 6.75 (commencing with Section 25299.10) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, unless expressly superseded by the definitions contained in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50103.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50104.

The provisions of this part, insofar as they are substantially the same as existing provisions of law relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations and not as new enactments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50105.

Any action or proceeding commenced before this part takes effect, or any right accrued, is not affected by this part, but these actions or proceedings shall conform to this part as far as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50106.

“Board” or “department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 104.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

50107.

“Fee payer” means any person liable for the payment of a fee imposed by Section 25299.41 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1366, Sec. 34.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Underground Storage Tank Fee [50108. - 50108.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Fee [50108. - 50108.]

50108.

(a) The fee imposed pursuant to Sections 25299.41 and 25299.43 of the Health and Safety Code shall be administered and collected by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration in accordance with this part.

(b) The inoperability of certain portions of Chapter 6.75 (commencing with Section 25299.10) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code pursuant to
 Section 25299.81 of the Health and Safety Code does not terminate the rights, obligations, or authorities, or any provision necessary to carry out the rights and obligations for the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration to collect unpaid fees pursuant to this part that are
 imposed, or to issue refunds or allow credits, dispose of moneys collected, or commence any action or proceeding regarding fees, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 25299.40) of Chapter 6.75 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, as that article read on December 31, 2035, or that have become due before January 1, 2036, including any interest or penalties that accrue before, on, or after January 1, 2036, associated with those unpaid fees, for deposit into the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 64.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration and Security [50108.1. - 50108.2.]

50108.1.

Every person who is an owner of an underground storage tank for which a permit is required pursuant to Section 25284 of the Health and Safety Code containing petroleum shall register with the board on forms provided by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 639, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

50108.2.

(a) The board, whenever it determines it to be necessary to ensure compliance with this part, may require any person subject to this part to place with it any security that the board determines to be reasonable, taking into account the circumstances of that person. Any security in the form of cash, government bonds, or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions shall be held by the board in trust to be used solely in the manner provided by this section. The board may sell the security at a public auction if it becomes
 necessary to do so in order to recover any fee or any amount required to be collected, including any interest or penalty due. 

(b) Notice of the sale authorized in subdivision (a) shall be served upon the person who placed the security personally or by mail. If service is made by mail, the notice shall be addressed to the person at his or her address as it appears in the records of the board. Service shall be made at least 30 days prior to the sale in the case of personal service, and at least 40 days prior to the sale in the case of service by mail. Upon any sale, any surplus above the amounts due shall be returned to the person who placed the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Determinations [50109. - 50120.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. Reports and Payments [50109. - 50112.6.]

50109.

The fee collected under Section 50108 is due and payable to the board quarterly on or before the 25th day of the month following the end of each calendar quarter. Each feepayer, on or before the 25th day of the month following the quarterly period for which the fee is due, shall prepare a fee return for the preceding quarterly period, in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the total number of gallons of petroleum placed into underground storage tanks which he or she owns during the period,
 the amount of the fee for the period covered by the return, and any other information that the board determines to be necessary. The feepayer shall deliver the return, together with a remittance of the amount of the fee due, to the office of the board on or before the 25th day of the month following the quarterly period for which the fee is due. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

50110.

The board, if it determines it to be necessary in order to facilitate the administration of this part, may require returns and payments specified under Section 50109 to be made for periods other than quarterly.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1366, Sec. 42.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

50111.
